Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Article 7. Group Health Insurance Plan for Employees of School Districts and Community/Junior College Districts
[Repealed].

§§ 25-15-251 through 25-15-265.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1999, ch. 511, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1999.

§25-15-251. [Laws, 1991, ch. 558, § 1; Laws 1993, ch. 533, § 1; Laws 1995, ch. 449, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1995]

§25-15-253. [Laws, 1991, ch. 558, § 2; Laws 1995, ch. 449, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1995]

§25-15-255. [Laws, 1991, ch. 558, § 3; Laws 1993, ch. 533, § 2; Laws 1994, ch. 615, § 2; Laws 1995, ch. 554, § 5; Laws 1996, ch. 491, § 2; Laws 1997, ch. 606, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 24, 1997)]

§25-15-256. [Laws 1994, ch. 615, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1994]

§25-15-257. [Laws, 1991, ch. 558, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991)]

§25-15-259. [Laws, 1991, ch. 558, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991)]

§25-15-261. [Laws, 1991, ch. 558, § 6; Laws 1993, ch. 533, § 3; Laws 1994, ch. 615, § 3; Laws 1995, ch. 449, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1995]

§25-15-263. [Laws, 1991, ch. 558, § 7; Laws 1993, ch. 533, § 4; Laws 1994, ch. 615, § 4; Laws 1995, ch. 449, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1995]

§25-15-265. [Laws, 1991, ch. 558, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 12, 1991)]